Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1303
Educational Technology Center; created; mission.

The Educational Technology Center within the State Department of Education is created. The mission of the center is to achieve the legislative goals set forth in section 79-1302 and to provide leadership and support for the integration of technology and innovation into Nebraska elementary and secondary schools in order to provide quality education and equal opportunity for Nebraska learners.

Laws 1988, LB 1117, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,140.10;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 959;

Laws 2003, LB 67, § 28;

Laws 2006, LB 1208, § 15.